North Carolina, session 2025, HB821.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The General Assembly finds that there is a backlog of drivers unable
to renew their drivers licenses in person. It is the intent of this act to eliminate that backlog.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding G.S. 20-7, or any other statute to the contrary, a Class
C drivers license shall remain valid for purposes of establishing the license holder's driving
privilege for a period of up to two years after its expiration. This section shall not apply to either
of the following:
(1) To any drivers license that is currently canceled, revoked, or suspended.
(2) A Real ID compliant drivers license that has been valid for a period of eight
years or more.
SECTION 3. The Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee shall
review any studies or audits conducted or commissioned by, or any recommendations made by,
the Committee, the North Carolina Department of Transportation, or the Office of the State
Auditor to address staffing shortages, employee retention, outdated technology, and any other
structural or systemic issues that are contributing to excessive wait times and delays at the
Division of Motor Vehicles. The Committee shall report its findings, together with any
recommended legislation, to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly.
SECTION 4. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to Class C drivers
licenses that expire on or after that date. This act expires December 31, 2027.
*H821-v-2*